Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 2-18, as
amended by Section 608, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (2 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2-18), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 2A-28, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 20-8, is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15559 JL 12/18/25


Req. No. 15559 Page 1